Massachusetts, session 194th, H1482.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after Chapter 121H the following
chapter: Chapter 121F Accessory Dwelling Unit Fund
Section 1. As used in this section, the following words shall have the following meanings
unless the context clearly requires otherwise
"Accessory Dwelling Unit", As defined in MGL Chapter 40a Section 1a
"Eligible Participant", A property owner who has an income of up to 110% of the area
median income, as defined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development
"Fund", the Accessory Dwelling Unit Fund established in section 2
Section 2. There shall be an Accessory Dwelling Unit Trust Fund to support low- and
moderate-income property owners whose incomes are not more than 110 per cent of median
income as determined by the federal Department of Housing and Urban Development build an
of 3

Accessory Dwelling Unit. The fund shall be administered by the Executive Office of Housing
and Livable Communities or through contracts with 1 or more of the following administering
agencies: (i) the Community Economic Development Assistance Corporation, established in
chapter 40H; (ii) the Massachusetts Housing Partnership Fund, established in section 35 of
chapter 405 of the acts of 1985; or (iii) the Massachusetts Housing Finance Agency, established
in chapter 708 of the acts of 1966; provided, that an administering agency may directly offer
financial assistance for the purposes pursuant to this section or may enter into subcontracts with
non-profit organizations established pursuant to chapter 180 for those purposes; and provided
further, that the administering agency may establish additional program requirements through
regulations or policy guidelines.
Section 3. There shall be credited to the fund: (i) revenue from appropriations or other
money authorized by the general court and specifically designated for the fund; (ii) any gifts,
grants, private contributions, repayment of loans, fees and charges imposed relative to the
making of loans, grants, subsidies, credit enhancements and other financial assistance; (iii) any
investment income earned on the fund’s assets; and (iv) any other sources. Money remaining in
the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund.
Section 4. Funds expended pursuant to this chapter may be in the form of grants, loans or
other financial assistance to eligible participants to build an accessory dwelling unit by providing
reimbursement or an initial outlay of funds to cover pre-development and non-recurring closing
costs associated with building an Accessory Dwelling Unit, which may include, but shall not be
limited to, architectural and design costs, site preparation, such as clearance or landscaping,
utility connection fees, impact fees, permitting fees, or other services and activities determined
of 3

by the administering agency to be a pre-development or non-recurring closing costs; provided,
however, that assistance shall be the minimum amount necessary to make a project feasible.
Funds expended pursuant to this chapter may finance low and no interest loans, grants,
subsidies, credit enhancements and other financial assistance as determined by the administering
agency for the purpose of supporting the construction and development of Accessory Dwelling
Units; provided, however, that assistance shall be the minimum amount necessary to make a
project feasible.
Section 5. The Executive Office of Housing and Livable Communities may promulgate
regulations for the implementation, administration and enforcement of this chapter and may, in
consultation with the Executive Office of Economic Development, issue guidelines for the fund.
of 3